District of Columbia statutes.
24-907

Rules.

The Mayor may issue rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2.

Dec. 7, 1985, D.C. Law 6-69, § 8, 32 DCR 4587
June 8, 2001, D.C. Law 13-302, § 9(f), 47 DCR 7249
1981 Ed., § 24-807.
D.C. Law 13-302, in the section heading, deleted “; division of responsibility”; and deleted “, including the division of responsibility between the District of Columbia Board of Parole and the District of Columbia Department of Corrections” following “Title 2,”.
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 9(f) of the Sentencing Reform Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-410, August 11, 2000, 47 DCR 7271).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 9(f) of the Sentencing Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 13-462, November 7, 2000, 47 DCR 9443).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 9(f) of Sentencing Reform Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-2, February 2, 2001, 48 DCR 2239).
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 9(f) of Sentencing Reform Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2001 (D.C. Act 14-51, May 2, 2001, 48 DCR 4370).
Delegation of authority pursuant to Law 6-69, see Mayor’s Order 87-61, March 10, 1987.